Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1208
Rules and regulations; promulgation.

Rules and regulations issued by the secretary under sections 69-1201 to 69-1217 shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 8, p. 1182.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.